Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20173-145
Division; airport; lease; sell; supplies.

The division may (1) lease, for a term not exceeding ten years, such airports, other air navigation facilities, or real property acquired or set apart for airport purposes, to private parties, any municipal or state government, the national government, or any department of any such government for operation, (2) lease or assign, for a term not exceeding ten years, to private parties, any municipal or state government, the national government, or any department of any such government for operation or other use consistent with the purposes of the State Aeronautics Act, space, area, improvements, or equipment on such airports, (3) sell any part of such airports, other air navigation facilities, or real property to any municipal or state government, or to the United States or any department or instrumentality thereof, for aeronautical purposes or purposes incidental thereto, and (4) confer the privilege or concession of supplying, upon the airports, goods, commodities, things, services, and facilities, so long as in each case in so doing the public is not deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use thereof.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 11(5), p. 98;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 38.